Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0408

Notice of members meeting.

(1) A limited cooperative association shall notify each member of the time, date, and place of a members meeting at least ten and not more than one hundred twenty days before the meeting.

(2) Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, notice of an annual members meeting need not include any purpose of the meeting.

(3) Notice of a special meeting of members must include each purpose of the meeting as contained in the demand under RCW 23.100.0407(1) (c) or (d) or as voted upon by the board of directors under RCW 23.100.0407(1)(b).

(4) Notice of a members meeting must be given in a record unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances.

[ 2019 c 37 s 408.]